Utah statutes.
26-23b-107.   Exemptions from liability.

(1)  A health care provider may not be discharged, suspended, disciplined, or harassed for making a report pursuant to this chapter.

(2)  A health care provider may not incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of making any report under this chapter so long as the report is made in good faith.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 2002 General Session

